North Carolina, session 2025, HB599.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the
North Carolina Forest Service (NCFS) the sum of:
(1) Two million six hundred thousand dollars ($2,600,000) in recurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide an across-the-board salary increase of
seven and one-half percent (7.5%) to NCFS employees, effective July 1, 2025.
(2) Five million two hundred thousand dollars ($5,200,000) in recurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide an additional across-the-board salary
increase of seven and one-half percent (7.5%) to NCFS employees, effective
July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. Effective Date. – This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H599-v-1*